Hawaii statutes.
§412:9-407 Limits on transactions with
affiliates, executive officers, directors or principal shareholders. No
depository financial services loan company shall make any loan and extension of
credit or engage in any transaction in violation of section 18j of the Federal
Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. §1828(j) or sections 22(g), 22(h), 23A or 23B
of the Federal Reserve Act, 12 U.S.C. §§375a, 375b, 371c and 371c‑1. [L
1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next